New York, session 2025-2026, A8950.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 203 of the workers' compensation law, as amended by 2 chapter 651 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 203. Employees eligible for benefits under section two hundred four 4 of this article. Employees in employment of a covered employer for four 5 or more consecutive weeks and employees in employment during the work 6 period usual to and available during such four or more consecutive weeks 7 in any trade or business in which they are regularly employed and in 8 which hiring from day to day of such employees is the usual employment 9 practice shall be eligible for disability benefits as provided in 10 section two hundred four of this article. Employees in employment of a 11 covered employer for twenty-six or more consecutive weeks and employees 12 in employment during the work period usual to and available during such 13 twenty-six or more consecutive weeks in any trade or business in which 14 they are regularly employed and in which hiring from day to day of such 15 employees is the usual employment practice shall be eligible for family 16 leave benefits as provided in section two hundred four of this article. 17 For purposes of this article, any person enlisted, appointed, or commis- 18 sioned to be a part of the New York army national guard or the New York 19 air national guard for twenty-six or more consecutive weeks shall be 20 eligible for family leave benefits. For purposes of this article, 21 employees who perform construction, demolition, reconstruction, exca- 22 vation, rehabilitation, repairs, renovations, alterations, or improve- 23 ments for multiple employers pursuant to a collective bargaining agree- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13383-02-6 A. 8950--A 2 1 ment shall be eligible for family leave benefits if they were employed 2 for at least twenty-six of the last thirty-nine weeks by any covered 3 employer which is signatory to a collective bargaining agreement. Every 4 such employee shall continue to be eligible for family leave benefits 5 only during employment with a covered employer. Every such employee 6 shall continue to be eligible for disability benefits during such 7 employment and for a period of four weeks after such employment termi- 8 nates regardless of whether the employee performs any work for remunera- 9 tion or profit in non-covered employment. If during such four week peri- 10 od the employee performs any work for remuneration or profit for another 11 covered employer the employee shall become eligible for disability bene- 12 fits immediately with respect to that employment. In addition every such 13 employee who has previously completed four or more consecutive weeks in 14 employment with the covered employer for purposes of disability bene- 15 fits, or twenty-six or more consecutive weeks in employment with the 16 covered employer for purposes of paid family leave, and returns to work 17 with the same employer after an agreed and specified unpaid leave of 18 absence or vacation without pay shall become eligible for benefits imme- 19 diately with respect to such employment. For purposes of this article, 20 any person enlisted, appointed, or commissioned to be a part of the New 21 York army national guard or the New York air national guard and who 22 became eligible for paid family leave benefits by being enlisted, 23 appointed, or commissioned for at least twenty-six of the prior thirty- 24 nine weeks, and who returns to such enlistment, appointment, or commis- 25 sion after an agreed and specified unpaid leave of absence or vacation 26 without pay with the New York army national guard or the New York air 27 national guard shall become eligible for family leave benefits imme- 28 diately with respect to such enlistment, appointment, or commission. For 29 purposes of this article, employees who perform construction, demoli- 30 tion, reconstruction, excavation, rehabilitation, repairs, renovations, 31 alterations, or improvements for multiple employers pursuant to a 32 collective bargaining agreement and who became eligible for paid family 33 leave benefits by working at least twenty-six of the last thirty-nine 34 weeks, and who return to work after an agreed and specified unpaid leave 35 of absence or vacation without pay with the same or different employer 36 shall become eligible for family leave benefits immediately with respect 37 to such employment. In the case of employees who perform construction, 38 demolition, reconstruction, excavation, rehabilitation, repairs, reno- 39 vations, alterations, or improvements for multiple employers pursuant to 40 a collective bargaining agreement who are laid-off and receive unemploy- 41 ment benefits, such employees shall be eligible for family leave bene- 42 fits upon returning to work if they are otherwise qualified by having 43 worked at least twenty-six of the last thirty-nine weeks. An employee 44 who during a period in which such employee is eligible to receive bene- 45 fits under subdivision two of section two hundred seven of this article 46 returns to employment with a covered employer and an employee who is 47 currently receiving unemployment insurance benefits or benefits under 48 section two hundred seven of this article and who returns to employment 49 with a covered employer shall become eligible for disability benefits 50 immediately with respect to such employment. An employee regularly in 51 the employment of a single employer on a work schedule less than the 52 employer's normal work week shall become eligible for disability leave 53 benefits on the twenty-fifth day of such regular employment and for 54 purposes of paid family leave an employer shall become eligible for 55 benefits on the one hundred seventy-fifth day of such regular employ- 56 ment. An employee who is eligible for disability and family leave bene- A. 8950--A 3 1 fits in the employment of a covered employer shall not be deemed, for 2 the purposes of this article, to have such employment terminated during 3 any period such employee is eligible to receive benefits under section 4 two hundred four of this article with respect to such employment. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.